Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 446.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Government" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its executive or
judicial branch officials, any of its political subdivisions, any city, county,
charter county government, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, unified local government, metropolitan government, and any
other government board or commission and includes:
1. Any administrative organization of the Commonwealth described in
KRS 12.020;
2. Any person acting under color of state law; or
3. Any person who is threatening or attempting to enforce a law, rule,
policy, or administrative regulation adopted by the Commonwealth or
any of its political subdivisions; and
(b) "Substantially burden" means any action that directly or indirectly
constrains, inhibits, curtails, or denies the sincere exercise of religion by
any person or compels any action contrary to a person's sincere exercise of
religion, including but not limited to:
1. Withholding benefits;
2. Assessing criminal, civil, or administrative penalties; or
3. Excluding from governmental programs or access to governmental
facilities.
(2) Government shall not substantially burden a person's freedom of religion. The right
to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief may
not be substantially burdened unless the government proves by clear and
convincing evidence that it has a compelling governmental interest in infringing the
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1093
specific act or refusal to act and has used the least restrictive means to further that
interest.[ A "burden" shall include indirect burdens such as withholding benefits,
assessing penalties, or an exclusion from programs or access to facilities.]
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a person other than a
sentenced inmate of a correctional facility, whose sincere religious exercise has
been substantially burdened in violation of this section may assert that violation
as a claim or defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding, regardless of
whether the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions is a party to the
proceeding, and obtain appropriate relief including relief against the
Commonwealth or its political subdivisions. Appropriate relief shall include but is
not limited to:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Declaratory relief;
(c) Compensatory damages;
(d) Costs;
(e) Expert witness fees; and
(f) Attorney's fees.
(4) (a) A sentenced inmate of a correctional facility whose sincere religious
exercise has been substantially burdened in violation of this section may
assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial or administrative
proceeding, regardless of whether the Commonwealth or any of its political
subdivisions is a party to the proceeding, and obtain appropriate relief that
shall be limited to injunctive relief and declaratory relief, provided the
inmate first sends written notice of an intent to bring suit under this section
to the Attorney General of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days prior to the
filing of any lawsuit, and the Attorney General elects not to issue an opinion
under this section as provided under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1093
(b) In the event of an inmate complaint, the Attorney General may elect to issue
an opinion on whether or not a violation of this statute occurred and shall
provide notice to the inmate of an intention to issue an opinion.
(c) If the Attorney General provides notice of his or her intent to issue an
opinion, the opinion shall be issued within forty-five (45) days of receipt of
the inmate's complaint finding a violation or a determination that there was
no violation.
(d) Upon the issuance of an opinion finding there was a violation, the Attorney
General shall direct the remedial measures to be taken by the officials who
are responsible for the violation further directing that the corrective action
shall be implemented within fourteen (14) days of the issuance of the
opinion.
(e) Failure to implement the corrective action as provided under paragraph (d)
of this subsection shall be subject to enforcement by the Attorney General
or the aggrieved inmate as provided under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(f) Any sentenced inmate of a correctional facility or any official who is found
responsible for any violation may appeal any opinion to a Circuit Court of
competent jurisdiction, which shall review the opinion in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) The Attorney General shall have standing to enforce the provisions of this statute
in the event of any violation and shall have standing to intervene in any action
seeking enforcement. In addition to declaratory and injunctive relief, the
Attorney General shall be entitled to collect civil penalties for any violation in an
amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day of the
violation.
(6) This statute applies to all state and local laws, administrative regulations, and
ordinances and the implementation of those laws, administrative regulations, and
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1093
ordinances, whether statutory or otherwise, and whether adopted before or after
the effective date of this Act. State laws enacted after the effective date of this Act
shall be subject to this section unless this statute is explicitly excluded. This
section shall not be construed to authorize any government to burden any
religious belief.
(7) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.
(8) Sovereign, judicial, and governmental immunity, including any immunity under
the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, are waived to
the extent of liability created under this section.
(9) Qualified official immunity shall be waived if:
(a) An aggrieved person files, a written complaint with the Attorney General,
and within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the complaint, the Attorney
General either:
1. Issues an opinion finding a violation that the responsible government
officials fail to remedy within fourteen (14) days from the issuance of
the opinion, in which case punitive damages shall also be available as
a remedy; or
2. Fails to issue an opinion within the thirty (30) day time period; or
(b) There is published case law from the Supreme Court of Kentucky, the
Kentucky Court of Appeals, the United States Supreme Court, or the United
States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit that finds a violation of this or
any other state's religious freedom restoration statute, a violation of the
federal religious freedom restoration statute, or a free exercise violation
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution under same or
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1093
similar facts.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 12:42 PM Jacketed